Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.093

Involuntary medication—Civil commitment.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

When the court must make a determination whether to order involuntary medications for the purpose of competency restoration or for maintenance of competency, the court shall inquire, and shall be told, and to the extent that the prosecutor or defense attorney is aware, whether the defendant is the subject of a pending civil commitment proceeding or has been ordered into involuntary treatment pursuant to a civil commitment proceeding.

[ 2004 c 157 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—Effective date—2004 c 157: See notes following RCW 10.77.010.